Hawaii statutes.
§346-5 Reports. The director of human
services shall file with the governor a written report or reports at such
times, at least once in each year, and in such form as shall be requested by
the governor covering the condition and activities of the department of human
services and of each division thereof. [L 1941, c 296, §1(10); RL 1945, §4810;
RL 1955, §107-10; HRS §346-5; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Cross References

Annual reports, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next